en: Baby Jumpers & Swings
xx: Baby Jumpers & Swings
cs: Dětská houpadla
da: Babyhoppegynger og -gynger
de: Babyschaukeln & Türhopser
es: Saltadores y columpios para bebés
fr: Sauteurs et balancelles pour bébés
it: Jumper e altalene per bebè
ja: ベビー自動スイング
nl: Babyjumpers en - schommels
no: Hoppestoler og husker for babyer
pl: Szelki do skakania i huśtawki
pt: Balanços para bebês
ru: Детские прыгунки и качели
sv: Hoppgungor och babygungor
tr: Hoppalalar ve Salıncaklar

en: Baby Mobile Accessories
xx: Baby Mobile Accessories
cs: Závěsné hračky – příslušenství
da: Babyuroer – tilbehør
de: Baby-Mobile-Zubehör
es: Accesorios móviles para bebés
fr: Accessoires de mobiles pour bébés
it: Accessori per la mobilità del bebè
ja: ベッドメリー・モビール関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor babymobielen
no: Tilbehør til babyuroer
pl: Akcesoria do karuzel dla niemowląt
pt: Acessórios para móbile infantil
ru: Принадлежности для детских мобилей
sv: Tillbehör till barnmobiler
tr: Bebekler için Hareketli Teçhizatlar

en: Baby Mobiles
xx: Baby Mobiles
cs: Dětské závěsné hračky
da: Babyuroer
de: Baby-Mobiles
es: Móviles para bebés
fr: Mobiles pour bébés, Mobile
it: Giostrine per lettino
ja: ベッドメリー・モビール
nl: Mobiles voor baby's
no: Babyuroer
pl: Karuzele do łóżeczka
pt: Móbiles
ru: Детские мобили
sv: Bebismobiler
tr: Dönenceler

en: Baby Soothers
xx: Baby Soothers
cs: Dudlíky
da: Sutter
de: Schnuller & Beruhigung
es: Mordedores para bebés
fr: Tétines pour bébés
it: Consolatori per bebè
ja: おやすみトイ
nl: Fopspenen
no: Smokker
pl: Smoczki dla niemowląt
pt: Chupetas
ru: Соски
sv: Nappar
tr: Emzikler

en: Baby Walkers & Entertainers
xx: Baby Walkers & Entertainers
cs: Dětská chodítka a chodítka s hračkami
da: Gåvogne og aktivitetscentre
de: Babylauflernhilfen
es: Andadores y centros de entretenimiento para bebés
fr: Trotteurs et tables d'activités pour bébés
it: Girelli e palestrine
ja: ベビー用歩行器
nl: Looprekken en speelstoelen voor baby's
no: Baby-gåstoler og -underholdningsstasjoner
pl: Chodziki i chodziki z zabawkami dla niemowląt
pt: Andadores e animadores para bebês
ru: Ходунки
sv: Lära-gå-stolar
tr: Yürüteçler ve Eğlendiriciler

en: Play Mats & Gyms
xx: Play Mats & Gyms
cs: Hrací podložky
da: Legemåtter
de: Spiel- & Krabbeldecken
es: Alfombras de actividades y gimnasios
fr: Tapis d'éveil
it: Tappeti e palestre gioco
ja: プレイジム・プレイマット
nl: Speelkleden en babygyms
no: Lekematter og babygym
pl: Maty do zabawy
pt: Tapetes e centros de atividades
ru: Детские коврики
sv: Lekmattor och gym
tr: Oyun Halıları ve Egzersiz Düzenekleri

en: Play Gyms
xx: Play Gyms
cs: Konstrukce na hraní
da: Aktivitetstæpper
de: Spieldecken
es: Gimnasios para bebés
fr: Tapis de jeu avec arches
it: Palestrine
ja: ベビージム
nl: Babygyms
no: Babygym
pl: Stojaki gimnastyczne dla niemowląt
pt: Tapetes de atividades
ru: Детские развивающие коврики
sv: Babygym
tr: Aktivite Merkezleri

en: Play Mats
xx: Play Mats
cs: Podložky na hraní
da: Legetæpper
de: Krabbeldecken
es: Alfombrillas de ejercicio
fr: Tapis de jeu
it: Tappeti da gioco
ja: プレイマット
nl: Speelmatten
no: Lekematter
pl: Maty dla dzieci
pt: Tapetes para brincar
ru: Детские игровые коврики
sv: Lekmattor
tr: Oyun Matları

en: Play Yards
xx: Play Yards
cs: Dětské ohrádky
da: Kravlegårde
de: Lauf- & Spielgitter
es: Parques para bebés
fr: Parcs
it: Box
ja: プレイヤード
nl: Speelplaatsen
no: Lekegrinder
pl: Kojce
pt: Cercadinhos
ru: Детские манежи
sv: Lekhagar
tr: Oyun Bahçeleri

en: Push & Pull Toys
xx: Push & Pull Toys
cs: Tahací hračky
da: Trække- og skubbelegetøj
de: Zieh- & Schiebespielzeug
es: Juguetes para arrastrar
fr: Jouets à tirer et à pousser
it: Giocattoli da spingere e tirare
ja: 手押し車・カタカタ
nl: Duw- en trekspeelgoed
no: Dytt- og dra-leker
pl: Zabawki do ciągnięcia i pchania
pt: Brinquedos de empurrar e de puxar
ru: Игрушки-каталки
sv: Putta och dra-leksaker
tr: İtmeli ve Çekmeli Oyuncaklar

en: Rattles
xx: Rattles
cs: Chrastítka
da: Rangler
de: Babyrasseln
es: Sonajeros
fr: Hochets
it: Sonagli
ja: がらがら
nl: Rammelaars
no: Rangler
pl: Grzechotki
pt: Chocalhos
ru: Погремушки
sv: Skallror
tr: Çıngıraklar

en: Sorting & Stacking Toys
xx: Sorting & Stacking Toys
cs: Kostičky ke třídění a skládání
da: Sorterings- og stabellegetøj
de: Sortier-\, Stapel- & Steckspielzeug
es: Bloques y juegos de clasificación
fr: Jouets à trier et à empiler
it: Giochi da ordinare e impilare
ja: 並べ替え・積み上げおもちゃ
nl: Sorteer- en stapelspeelgoed
no: Sorterings- og stableleker
pl: Zabawki do sortowania i układania
pt: Brinquedos de triagem e de montar
ru: Моторные детские игрушки
sv: Sortera och stapla-leksaker
tr: Sıralama ve İstifleme Oyuncakları

en: Baby Transport
xx: Baby Transport
cs: Přeprava dětí
da: Babytransport
de: Babytransport
es: Transporte de bebés
fr: Transport de bébés
it: Trasporto bebè
ja: ベビー用外出用品
nl: Baby's vervoeren
no: Babytransport
pl: Transport niemowląt
pt: Transporte de bebês
ru: Средства для перевозки детей
sv: Barntransport
tr: Bebek Taşıma Ürünleri

en: Baby & Toddler Car Seats
xx: Baby & Toddler Car Seats
cs: Dětské a kojenecké autosedačky
da: Baby og småbørn – bilsæder
de: Baby- & Kleinkindautositze
es: Sillas de coche
fr: Sièges auto pour bébés et enfants, Siège Auto
it: Seggiolini per auto
ja: チャイルドシート
nl: Autozitjes voor baby's en peuters
no: Bilseter for baby og småbarn
pl: Foteliki samochodowe dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Cadeiras de bebê para automóvel
ru: Детские автокресла
sv: Bilbarnstolar
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Oto Koltukları

en: Baby Carriers
xx: Baby Carriers
cs: Vaky na děti
da: Babybæreseler
de: Babyträger
es: Mochilas portabebés
fr: Porte-bébés
it: Marsupi portabebè
ja: 抱っこひも
nl: Draagdoeken en -zakken voor baby's
no: Bæreseler og bærestoler
pl: Nosidełka dla niemowląt
pt: Cangurus
ru: Сумки-кенгуру
sv: Bärselar
tr: Kangurular

en: Baby Strollers
xx: Baby Strollers
cs: Dětské kočárky
da: Babyklapvogn
de: Kinderwagen
es: Cochecitos de bebé
fr: Poussettes pour bébés, Poussette
it: Passeggini
ja: ベビーカー
nl: Wandelwagens
no: Barnevogner
pl: Wózki dla niemowląt
pt: Carrinhos de bebê
ru: Детские коляски
sv: Barnvagnar
tr: Bebek Arabaları

en: Baby Transport Accessories
xx: Baby Transport Accessories
cs: Přeprava dětí – příslušenství
da: Babytransport – tilbehør
de: Babytransportzubehör
es: Accesorios para el transporte de bebés
fr: Accessoires de transport pour bébés
it: Accessori trasporto bebè
ja: ベビー用外出小物
nl: Accessoires voor vervoeren van baby's
no: Baby-transporttilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do transportu niemowląt
pt: Acessórios para transporte de bebês
ru: Принадлежности изделий для перевозки детей
sv: Tillbehör till barntransport
tr: Bebek Taşıma Aksesuarları

en: Baby & Toddler Car Seat Accessories
xx: Baby & Toddler Car Seat Accessories
cs: Doplňky k dětským a kojeneckým autosedačkám
da: Baby og småbørn – bilsædetilbehør
de: Zubehör für Baby- & Kleinkindautositze
es: Accesorios de sillas de coche para bebés y niños
fr: Accessoires de siège auto pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Accessori seggiolini auto
ja: チャイルドシート関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kinderzitjes voor baby's en peuters
no: Bilsetetilbehør for baby og småbarn
pl: Akcesoria do fotelików samochodowych dla niemowląt i dzieci starszych
pt: Acessórios para cadeiras de bebê para automóvel
ru: Принадлежности для детских автокресел
sv: Tillbehör till bilbarnstolar
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Oto Koltuğu Aksesuarları

en: Baby Carrier Accessories
xx: Baby Carrier Accessories
cs: Doplňky k nosítkům pro děti
da: Babybæreseler – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Babyträger
es: Accesorios para cargadores de bebés
fr: Accessoires pour porte-bébés
it: Accessori marsupio
ja: 抱っこひも関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor babyvervoer
no: Baby-bæretilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do nosidełek dla niemowląt
pt: Acessórios para cangurus
ru: Принадлежности для рюкзаков-переносок
sv: Tillbehör till bärselar
tr: Kanguru Aksesuarları

en: Baby Stroller Accessories
xx: Baby Stroller Accessories
cs: Doplňky k dětským kočárkům
da: Babyklapvogn – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Kinderwagen
es: Accesorios de carritos para bebés
fr: Accessoires de poussette pour bébés
it: Accessori per passeggini
ja: ベビーカー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor wandelwagens
no: Barnevogn-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wózków dla niemowląt
pt: Acessórios para carrinho de bebê
ru: Принадлежности для детских колясок
sv: Tillbehör till barnvagnar
tr: Bebek Arabası Aksesuarları